Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,103
License Plate Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the License Plate Cash Fund which shall consist of money transferred to it pursuant to section 39-2215. All costs associated with the manufacture of license plates and decals provided for in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act and section 60-1804 shall be paid from funds appropriated from the License Plate Cash Fund. The fund shall be used exclusively for such purposes and shall be administered by the department. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 103.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.